Nevada, session 83, AB330.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:

Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Partnership for Research, Assessment,
Counseling, Therapy and Innovative Clinical Education of the
University of Nevada, Las Vegas, for the development and carrying
-
*AB330*

– 3 –
out of an internship program in child and adolescent psychology for
persons who are enrolled in a doctoral training program in
psychology the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $206,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $787,100
2. Money appropriated by subsection 1 must be used only for:
(a) Personnel, operating, travel, professional development and
equipment costs related to the development and carrying out of the
internship program, including, without limitation, the costs
associated with supervision of the interns, training materials and
clinical supplies;
(b) Stipends for the interns;
(c) The expenses associated with obtaining membership to the
Association of Psychology Postdoctoral and Internship Centers; and
(d) The expenses associated with obtaining the accreditation of
the American Psychological Association for the internship program.
3. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB330*